Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.13.040

Compensation of councilmembers—Expenses.

The salaries of the councilmembers, including the mayor, shall be fixed by ordinance and may be revised from time to time by ordinance, but any increase or reduction in the compensation attaching to an office shall not become effective until the expiration of the term then being served by the incumbent: PROVIDED, That compensation of councilmembers may not be increased or diminished after their election nor may the compensation of the mayor be increased or diminished after the mayor has been chosen by the council.

Until councilmembers of a newly organized council-manager code city may lawfully be paid as provided by salary ordinance, such councilmembers shall be entitled to compensation in the same manner and in the same amount as councilmembers of such city prior to the adoption of this council-manager plan.

Until a salary ordinance can be passed and become effective as to elective officers of a newly incorporated code city, the first councilmembers shall be entitled to compensation as follows: In cities having less than five thousand inhabitants—twenty dollars per meeting for not more than two meetings per month; in cities having more than five thousand but less than fifteen thousand inhabitants—a salary of one hundred and fifty dollars per calendar month; in cities having more than fifteen thousand inhabitants—a salary of four hundred dollars per calendar month. A councilmember who is occupying the position of mayor, in addition to his or her salary as a councilmember, shall be entitled, while serving as mayor, to an additional amount per calendar month, or portion thereof, equal to twenty-five percent of the councilmember salary: PROVIDED, That such interim compensation shall remain in effect only until a salary ordinance is passed and becomes effective as to such officers, and the compensation provided herein shall not be construed as fixing the usual compensation of such officers. Councilmembers shall receive reimbursement for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the duties of their office, or the council by ordinance may provide for a per diem allowance. Procedure for approval of claims for expenses shall be as provided by ordinance.

[ 2009 c 549 s 3021; 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 25; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.13.040.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: See note following RCW 35A.01.070.